Alabama, session 2026rs, HB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) (1) The gross proceeds from the retail
sale of fish or other seafood which is in its original or
unmanufactured state by a producer are exempt from the state
sales and use tax as provided for in Section 40-23-2 and
40-23-61, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "producer" shall
mean a licensed commercial fisherman or an owner of a
commercially licensed vessel that is also licensed pursuant to
Section 9-12-125, Code of Alabama 1975 to sell seafood to the
public.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt the gross
proceeds from the retail sale of fish or seafood which is in
its original or unmanufactured state by a producer from county
or municipal sales and use taxes in accordance with Section
40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 1

40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB3 Engrossed
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB3 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Ways and Means
Education

Read for the second time and placed ................21-Jan-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................22-Jan-26
as amended
Yeas 103
Nays 0
Abstains 1


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3